California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
Any money that is deposited pursuant to Section 64309 that the secretary determines is available for investment may be invested or reinvested by the Treasurer or the council in any of the securities described in Article 1 (commencing with Section 16430) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, or placed in a depository as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16500) of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and handled in the same manner as money in the State Treasury. For these purposes, these moneys may also be combined with funds determined by the secretary to be available for investment pursuant to Section 58939 of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 21 of the Food and
 Agricultural Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 111.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

64312.

Any increment that is received from investment, reinvestment, or deposit of money pursuant to Section 64311 shall be deposited to the credit of the council. The Treasurer may deduct from this remittance an amount equal to the reasonable costs incurred in carrying out the provisions of this article or may bill the secretary for the costs and the secretary shall pay the costs from moneys collected pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 112.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Referendum [64320. - 64323.]

64320.

(a) Between July 1 and December 31 of each year ending in the number three or eight, the secretary shall, by the public hearing procedure, and if appropriate, the referendum procedure, provided for in this article, determine whether the council program provided for in this chapter shall continue in effect.

(b) If the secretary finds from evidence received at the hearing that a substantial question exists as to whether the council program is contrary to or does not effectuate the declared purposes or provisions of this chapter, the council program shall be submitted to referendum as provided in subdivision (c).

(c) If the secretary determines that a referendum procedure is appropriate, the secretary
 shall establish a referendum period of not to exceed 30 days during which period ballots shall be submitted to all producers and handlers on a statewide basis. If the secretary determines that the referendum period does not provide sufficient time for the balloting, the secretary may extend the referendum for an additional period not to exceed 30 days. The ballots shall provide a “yes” or “no” voting alternative to the question:

“Shall the Dairy Council of California be continued for the next five fiscal years beginning July 1 following this referendum?”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 371, Sec. 21.   (AB 425)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

64321.

If the council program is submitted to a referendum, the secretary shall find that producers and handlers statewide have assented to the council program if the secretary finds both of the following:

(a) Sixty-five percent or more of the total number of handlers voting approve the council program.

(b) (1) No less than 51 percent of the total number of eligible producers in the state voted in the referendum.

(2) Sixty-five percent or more of the total number of eligible producers who voted in the referendum and who produced 51 percent or more of the total amount of fluid milk produced during the second calendar month preceding the month of the beginning of the referendum period by all producers who voted in the referendum approve the council program, or 51 percent or more of the total number of eligible producers who voted in the referendum and who produced 65 percent or more of the total amount of fluid milk produced during the second calendar month preceding the month of the beginning of the referendum period by all producers who voted in the referendum, approve the council program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 371, Sec. 22.   (AB 425)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

64321.5.

If the secretary finds that producers and handlers have not assented to the council program pursuant to Section 64321, the council program may be resubmitted to a referendum as prescribed in this article within a period of no less than 60 days and no more than 180 days after the secretary announces the plan was not approved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 371, Sec. 23.   (AB 425)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

64322.

(a) If the secretary finds that producers and handlers have not assented to the council program pursuant to Section 64321 or, if the council program is resubmitted, Section 64321.5, operation of the provisions of this chapter and of the council shall be suspended beginning on July 1 following the referendum or, in the case of resubmission, referendums.

(b) After the effective date of suspension of the operation of the provisions of this chapter and of the council, the operations of the council shall be wound up, and any real and personal property held in the name of the council shall be liquidated and the proceeds, along with any and all remaining money held by the council, collected by assessment and not required to defray the expenses of winding up and terminating operations of the council, shall be returned
 upon a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding three months. However, if the secretary finds that the amounts returnable pursuant to this subdivision are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of the pro rata refund to these persons, any moneys remaining after payment of all expenses of winding up and terminating operations shall be withdrawn from the approved depository and paid into the State Treasury as unclaimed trust moneys.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 371, Sec. 24.   (AB 425)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

64323.

A ballot filed with the secretary pursuant to this chapter is confidential and shall not be divulged unless necessary for the proper determination of a court proceeding or hearing before the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 304, Sec. 118.   (AB 590)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. California Beef Council Law [64501. - 64736.]



  ARTICLE 1. Short Title and Definitions [64501. - 64507.]

64501.

This chapter shall be known as the “California Beef Council Law.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64502.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64503.

“Beef” includes veal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64504.

“Beef products” includes veal products.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64505.

“Council” means the California Beef Council.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64506.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, trust, association, cooperative association, and any other business unit or organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 132.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

64507.

“Producer” means any person that is engaged in the business of raising, breeding, feeding, or growing cattle or calves for dairy production or for beef production.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [64531. - 64534.]

64531.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that the provisions of this chapter are enacted in the exercise of the power of this state for the purposes of protecting and furthering the public health and welfare. It is further declared that the cattle industry of this state is affected with a public interest, in that, among other things:

(a) The production, processing, manufacture, and distribution of beef and beef products constitute a paramount industry of this state which not only provides substantial and required revenues for the state and its political subdivisions, and employment and a means of livelihood for many thousands of its population, but also furnishes essential foods that are vital to the public health and welfare.

(b) The stabilization, maintenance, and expansion of the cattle industry of California, and of the state, nationwide, and foreign markets for its products are necessary to assure the consuming public an adequate supply of foods which are indispensable in a proper human diet, to protect, for the state and its political subdivisions, a necessary source of tax revenue, to provide and maintain an adequate standard of living for a great segment of the population of this state, to maintain proper wage scales for those engaged in the cattle industry, and to maintain existing employment.

(c) The essentiality of beef and beef products in a proper human nutrition and to the maintenance of a high level of public health is such as to require that the public be made thoroughly aware thereof, and be protected against misrepresentation and deception, by the dissemination of accurate and scientific information relative to the healthful qualities of beef and beef products, their various classifications and the food values and industrial and medicinal uses thereof, the methods, care and precautions necessary to their proper production, processing, manufacture, and distribution, and the necessary costs and expenses thereof, and the necessity and desirability on the part of the public of using and consuming beef and beef products of the highest standards of quality.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64532.

The purposes of this chapter are as follows:

(a) To enable the cattle industry, with the aid of the state, to develop, maintain, and expand the state, nationwide, and foreign markets for beef and beef products produced, processed, manufactured, sold, or distributed in this state, for human consumption, and the use and consumption of these beef and beef products in those markets.

(b) In aid, but not in limitation, of the purpose in subdivision (a), to authorize and enable the director to formulate and effectuate, directly or in cooperation with other agencies and instrumentalities which are specified in this chapter, research relating to the nutritional qualities of beef and beef products and public consumption patterns and trends, and sales stimulation and consumer, or other, educational programs designed to increase the use and consumption of beef and beef products for human consumption.

(c) To provide funds for the administration and enforcement of this chapter by mandatory fees to be collected in the manner which is prescribed in this chapter, unless producers elect to provide those funds through voluntary contributions pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 64671).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 265, Sec. 1.   Effective July 11, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

64533.

This chapter shall be liberally construed. If any section, sentence, clause, or part of this chapter is, for any reason, held to be unconstitutional or invalid, such decision does not affect the remaining portion of this chapter but such unconstitutional or invalid provision is separable from the valid parts of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64534.

Any violation of this chapter is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 265, Sec. 2.   Effective July 11, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Administration [64561. - 64564.]

64561.

The director shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter, and may exercise any of the administrative powers which are conferred by Sections 11180 to 11191, inclusive, of the Government Code upon a head of a department. In order to effectuate the declared purposes of this chapter, the director may contract to carry out the declared intent and purposes of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64562.

Upon recommendations by the council the director may establish consistent with this chapter such regulations which cover the administration and enforcement of this chapter as may be necessary to carry out the purposes and attain the objectives of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64563.

Upon the issuance of any regulations that affect this chapter, a copy of the regulations shall be posted on the department’s Internet Web site. A copy of the regulations shall also be published in a newspaper of general circulation published in Sacramento, California, and in any other newspaper that the secretary may prescribe. No regulation shall become
 effective until five days after the date of the posting and publication. The secretary shall mail a copy of the notice of the issuance of the regulations to every person that is directly affected by the regulations whose name and address may be on file in the office of the secretary and to every person who files in the office of the secretary a written request for the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 223, Sec. 4.   (AB 3260)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

64564.

The director may purchase general liability insurance for the council subject to the provisions of this chapter in an amount he or she determines as necessary. The cost of the insurance shall be paid by the council. The insurance policy shall name the director, in his or her official capacity, and the council as insured parties for claims made against the council in its advisory capacity to the director or against the director regarding the activities of the council. The director, after consultation with the Attorney General, may refer claims to the insurance carrier for appropriate action. In the alternative, the director may require that claims be handled in the manner otherwise specified in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 383, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. California Beef Council [64591. - 64605.]

64591.

There is in the state government the California Beef Council which consists of 20 members and 20 alternates, all of whom shall be citizens and residents of this state and producers, packers, or processors.

The secretary shall appoint to the council six range cattlemen, six cattle feeders, and six dairymen nominated as producers and two packers or processors as hereinafter provided for, giving due regard to proper geographic distribution. This requirement shall not, however, operate to remove from office any member of the council. Subject to the provisions of this section and of Section 64592, present members of the council shall be eligible for reappointment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 291, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

64591.1.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this article, the director shall, with or without nominations, appoint one member and one alternate member to the council to represent the general public, in addition to the 20 members of the council otherwise provided for. Such persons shall not be affiliated in any way with the production or marketing of beef and shall have all of the rights and privileges, including voting, of any other member or alternate member of the council. The regular term of office of any member or respective alternate member appointed pursuant to this section shall be as close as possible to three full years and shall terminate on December 31 of the year which will provide for more than two but not more than three full years in office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

64592.

The terms of office of the members and alternates of the council shall be three years, except as provided in this section. The first appointments made under this chapter shall be so made that the terms of six members and their alternates shall expire at the end of one year, six members and their alternates shall expire at the end of two years, and seven members and their alternates shall expire at the end of three years. However, the terms of the first members and alternates appointed from slaughterers pursuant to amendments made to this section during the 1973 portion of the 1973–74 Regular Session of the Legislature shall be for three years.

Any vacancy which occurs during the unexpired term shall be filled by the director for the unexpired term from the eligible nominees. No council member or alternate shall serve more than two consecutive three-year terms. Service as an alternate does not disqualify a person to then serve two such terms as a member, and a member who was appointed for a one- or two-year term may serve two additional three-year terms.

The director may remove any member of the council or alternate for cause and upon such removal there is a vacancy which shall be filled in the manner as provided for the unexpired term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 418.)
-------------------------------------------

64593.

With or without recommendations or other nominations from the council or otherwise, during September and October of each year, the secretary may, if deemed appropriate or necessary by him or her, provide notice of, and hold, producer nomination meeting or meetings or may prepare and mail nomination forms to producers, for the purpose of receiving nominations for producer membership on the council. When nomination forms are mailed, the secretary shall utilize existing department lists of producers, packers, or processors. The secretary may also provide notice of, and hold, packer or processor nomination meeting or meetings or otherwise receive nominations for packers or processors, as deemed appropriate by him or her, including, but not necessarily limited to, nominations received by mailing similar nomination forms to the packers or processors on existing department lists. Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the secretary may, whenever and in any manner deemed necessary and appropriate by him or her, obtain nominations of producers, packers, or processors for membership on the council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 291, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

64595.

Press releases or other notice of nomination procedures, when conducted by mail, shall indicate that nominations shall be mailed to the director at his office in Sacramento and that the director will consider all nominations received by mail, within the time designated by him. Nominations by mail shall set forth (1) the name and address of each nominee, (2) whether each nominee is being nominated as a member or alternate member, (3) the type of producer (dairy, feeder, or range cattle) of each nominee, or, if a nominee is a slaughterer, that fact, and (4) the signature and address of the nominator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

64596.

A majority of the members of the council shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business, including the election of officers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64598.

The council shall select annually from its number, to serve at its pleasure, a chairman and vice chairman who, together with five other members selected annually by the council, shall constitute the executive committee of the council. The executive committee shall have and exercise such powers of the council as the council may delegate to it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64599.

The council shall have two regular meetings in each year at times and places which are fixed by the council. The times for regular meetings shall be fixed so that there is an interval of at least four calendar months between such meetings. The council may meet in special meetings at any time and place at the call of the chairman or upon the written request of five members of the council. The executive committee shall have two regular meetings each year at times and places which are fixed by it, and may meet in special meetings at any time and place at the call of the chairman or on call of a majority of the members of the executive committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64600.

The members of the council shall be reimbursed for necessary traveling and other expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 291, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

64601.

No member of the council shall receive compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 291, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

64602.

The director may require any employee or agent of the council to give a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company which is authorized to do business in this state, in favor of the director, in such sum, and containing such terms and conditions, as the director may prescribe. The cost of all such fidelity bonds of employees or agents of the council shall be paid from the funds which are collected pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64603.

No member or employee of the council shall be held responsible individually to any person for liability on any contract or agreement of the council. All salaries, expenses, costs, obligations, and liabilities which arise out of the administration and enforcement of this chapter are payable only from funds which are collected pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64604.

An alternate member of the council shall sit as a regular member of the council if the member for whom he is an alternate fails for any reason to attend any meeting of the council. He shall be compensated and reimbursed in the same manner and to the same extent as a regular member when so serving and when so serving has all the powers, duties, liabilities, and immunities of the member in whose place he is serving, except that the alternate to the chairman or vice chairman shall not succeed to the functions of these offices.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64605.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that producers, packers, or processors appointed to the council pursuant to this article are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular agricultural industry concerned, and that such representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, with respect to persons who are appointed to such council, the particular agricultural industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 291, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Powers and Duties [64631. - 64635.]

64631.

The duties of the council shall be advisory, except as to those duties which may be delegated to it by the director. The council may, subject to the approval of the director, exercise any of the following powers which may be delegated to the council by the director:

(a) To recommend to the director administrative regulations which relate to the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

(b) To investigate all matters which affect the administration of this chapter, and to report violations of it to the director.

(c) To employ and, at its pleasure, discharge a manager and such clerical help and other employees as it deems necessary, and to prescribe their duties and powers and fix their compensation.

(d) To contract with, or employ, and, at its pleasure, discharge such other persons as it deems necessary, and in the cases of such of them as it shall employ, to outline their powers and duties and fix their compensation.

(e) To establish offices, and incur expenses incidental thereto.

(f) To make such contracts and other agreements as may be proper to promote the sale of beef and beef products on either a local, state, national, or international basis.

(g) To cooperate with any other local, state, or national commission, organization, or agency, whether voluntary or created by state or federal law, and engaged in work or activities similar to the work and activities of the council, and recommend to the director the making of contracts and agreements with such organizations or agencies for carrying on joint programs of education, research, publicity, and advertising. In matters of research, however, the council shall cooperate with organizations of recognized professional standing which are adequately equipped with facilities for the research which is contemplated.

(h) To recommend to the director the institution and promotion of scientific research to develop or discover, or both, the health, food, therapeutic, dietetic, industrial, or other uses of beef and its products.

(i) To receive, invest, and disburse funds, pursuant to the provisions of Article 8 (commencing with Section 64691).

Funds may be allocated to agencies not specifically or solely engaged in carrying on research or promotion for beef, if the council and the director are satisfied that such allocations will be beneficial to the California beef industry, and will tend to effectuate the declared purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 641, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

64632.

The council shall keep such books, records, and accounts of all its transactions, dealings, contracts, agreements, funds, and expenditures as it deems necessary. Such books, records, and accounts shall at all times be open to inspection and audit by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64633.

A member, alternate agent, or employee of the council shall not do any of the following:

(a) Appear before any legislative committee of the state or federal government as a representative of the council unless requested to do so by such committee. 

(b) Lobby in any manner as a representative of the council.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64634.

None of the funds which are collected pursuant to this chapter shall be used for political contributions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

64635.

The council shall prepare annually, summarized statements of the activities in which it has been engaged in the previous annual period, and of the activities in which it proposes to engage in the ensuing annual period. Such statements shall be made available to all producers and slaughterers that request them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 418.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Education, Research, or Public Information Programs [64661. - 64663.]

64661.

The director shall conduct, or may cause the council to conduct, programs of education, research, or public information, which are designed to accomplish the following purposes, among others:

(a) Increase the consumption of beef and beef products.

(b) Gather, publicize, and disseminate accurate and scientific information which shows the importance of the use and consumption of beef and beef products in relation to the public health, economy, and diet, and proper nutrition of children and adults.

(c) Study means and methods which are employed in producing, processing, manufacturing, marketing, and distributing beef and beef products in order to comply with the sanitary and other regulations which are imposed by municipalities, this state, and the United States.

(d) Gather and disseminate information regarding the high standards which are observed and imposed to ensure pure and wholesome beef and beef products.

(e) Gather and disseminate information regarding the harmful effects on the public health resulting from the breakdown or instability of the cattle industry, the factors and conditions peculiar to the cattle industry which tend to cause an unbalanced production, the price of beef and beef products in relation to the cost of other items of food in a balanced diet.

(f) Gather and disseminate information regarding the nutritional qualities of beef and beef products and public consumption patterns and trends, and the factors which tend to promote increased consumption of beef and beef products, stabilize the industry, and foster a better understanding and more efficient cooperation among producers and slaughterers and the consuming public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 265, Sec. 3.   Effective July 11, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

64662.

No program or activity which is conducted or sponsored pursuant to this chapter shall make false or unwarranted claims, or disparage the quality, value, use, or sale of any commodity authorized by law to be marketed in this state, nor shall any such program be conducted with reference to a private brand or trade name which refers to beef or a beef product, except as provided for in Section 64663.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 291, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

64663.

The council shall not expend beef council funds for the advertising of brand name beef products, unless the expenditures are approved by a two-thirds vote of the council with the concurrence of the secretary. The council may expend beef council funds to conduct cost-sharing advertising with nonbeef brand name products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 291, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Referendum for Voluntary Fee Payment [64671. - 64676.]

64671.

Whenever a petition is presented to the director which has been signed by 2,000, or more, of the total producers in the state, not more than six months prior to its presentation to the director, the director shall conduct a referendum among producers to ascertain whether they favor the carrying on of a voluntary promotion and research program for beef as prescribed in Section 64661. At the time any person starts to circulate such a petition, he shall notify the director of such action. The director shall establish the period of time during which such referendum shall be conducted which shall be not less than 30 days nor more than 90 days.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 418.)
-------------------------------------------

64672.

The director shall count and tabulate the ballots received, and announce the results at the close of the referendum period. If the director finds from the ballots cast that 40 percent or more of all producers, as determined from a list to be established by the director, have voted and that not less than 65 percent of the total producers that produced not less than 51 percent of the volume of the commodity in the state or not less than 51 percent of the total producers that produced not less than 65 percent of the volume of the commodity in the state voting in such referendum favor carrying on a voluntary promotion and research program, the director shall declare the program a voluntary promotion and research program.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 418.)
-------------------------------------------

64673.

If the promotion and research program is declared to be voluntary, Section 64695 shall become operative and funds for the administration and enforcement of this chapter shall be provided by voluntary contributions rather than mandatory fees.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 418.)
-------------------------------------------

64674.

If the director finds that the referendum did not receive the required votes in favor of a voluntary promotion and research program pursuant to Section 64672, he shall declare this result and shall instruct the council to carry on the current program.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 418.)
-------------------------------------------

64675.

If the voluntary promotion and research program does not receive the required favorable vote or if less than the required number of producers have voted, another referendum shall not be petitioned for until after the expiration of a period of two years from the date of the referendum which failed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 418.)
-------------------------------------------

64676.

No referendum shall be conducted pursuant to this article until after the expiration of a period of two years from the effective date of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 418.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Financial Provisions [64691. - 64702.]

64691.

(a) In order to carry out the programs and administer the activities which are conducted pursuant to this chapter, except as specified in Sections 64691.5 and 64702, a fee of one dollar ($1) per head shall be paid on each sale of cattle and calves as specified in Section 64691.7. The fee shall be charged on all cattle and calves, except the following:

(1) Hides, skins, or reduction animals.

(2) Any cattle that are transported for purposes other than for sale or slaughter and without a change of ownership.

(3) Any cattle custom slaughtered exclusively for the owner, members of the owner’s household, or the owner’s nonpaying guests or employees.

(4) Any calves weighing less than 300 pounds.

(b) The fee shall not be charged or collected more than once from each owner upon the same animal and is nonrefundable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 291, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

64691.1.

Each person who is required to pay or collect the fees which are required in Section 64691 shall maintain a complete and accurate record of all transactions subject to fees under this chapter. These records shall contain information required by the director relating to the payment or collection of fees, shall be preserved for a period of two years, and shall be offered and submitted for inspection and audit at any reasonable time upon written demand by the director or his or her duly authorized agent.

All information obtained by the director or his or her duly authorized agent from any inspection or audit of records shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed except when required in a judicial proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 265, Sec. 5.   Effective July 11, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

64691.5.

A fee greater than one dollar ($1) per head on cattle and calves prescribed by Section 64691 shall not be charged pursuant to that section under a mandatory fee payment program, unless and until the greater fee is approved by the producers in this state, by a referendum to be submitted to the producers by the secretary. The secretary shall find that the producers have approved any greater fee, if he or she finds that 60 percent of the producers voting in the referendum voted in favor of charging the greater fee. Ballots shall be provided to producers from a list provided by the council and approved by the secretary, and to other producers who request a ballot that provide proof of eligibility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 291, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

64691.7.

The fees required pursuant to Section 64691 shall be due and payable as follows:

(a) The fee for cattle or calves, whether originating in the state or out of state, shall be paid by the seller. The fee shall be charged and collected from the seller or from the seller’s account and paid to the secretary by each operator of any stockyard, livestock auction market, slaughterhouse, or registered feedlot in the state. The fee is due and payable to the secretary on or before the 15th day of the month next succeeding the month in which the cattle and calves are sold. Fees that are not collected in the manner provided in this subdivision shall be collected from the seller by the Bureau of Livestock Identification at the time that brand inspection fees
 are collected.

(b) The fee for cattle or calves for which the fee would not otherwise be collected pursuant to subdivision (a) and that are also exempt from brand inspection, shall be charged and collected from the seller in a manner determined by the department.

(c) Any fees that are not collected in the manner specified in subdivision (a) or (b) shall be paid to the secretary directly by the seller on or before the 15th day of the month next succeeding the month in which the sale occurs.

(d) A fee shall be paid for each head of cattle or calves slaughtered in the state unless specifically exempted by Section 64691 or 64702. If the fee is not deducted from the seller it shall be paid by the purchaser or slaughterer and is due and payable in the manner provided in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 410, Sec. 1.   (SB 965)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

64693.

(a) Any person who fails to pay, collect, or remit any fees due within the time specified in this chapter shall be liable for administrative costs incurred by the department in enforcing this chapter, including the costs of any audit performed pursuant to Section 64691.1. In addition, the person shall be liable civilly in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for each head of cattle or calves which is sold. The person shall also be liable for all of the following:

(1) The total amount of fees due.

(2) The cost of the civil suit including attorney’s fees.

(3) Two percent interest per month on the unpaid balance of the fees owed.

(b) At the request of the director, the Attorney General shall file an action in an appropriate court to collect any unpaid fees, civil penalties, and interest, or in the alternative, the department may bring the action when appropriate.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 265, Sec. 11.   Effective July 11, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

64693.5.

At the request of the director, the Attorney General shall petition an appropriate court for the issuance of an injunction, restraining any person in violation of any requirement specified in this chapter or regulations adopted pursuant thereto from continuing the violation. The court may also require the performance of any obligation imposed under this chapter or any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 265, Sec. 12.   Effective July 11, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

64694.
